Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2227
Legal notices; week, defined.

Wherever the statutes of Nebraska provide for the publication of notices any number of weeks, or for any number of weeks, the term week shall be construed to mean either a period of time known as a calendar week beginning on Sunday and ending with Saturday, or any period of seven consecutive days beginning with the date of the first publication of notice; Provided, however, nothing herein contained shall be held to apply to any notice published prior to April 17, 1915.

Laws 1915, c. 222, § 1, p. 491;

C.S.1922, § 9527;

C.S.1929, § 20-2228;

R.S.1943, § 25-2227.

Notice of publication of formation of drainage district was sufficient. Prucka v. Eastern Sarpy Drainage Dist., 157 Neb. 284, 59 N.W.2d 761 (1953).

Construction of statute providing for notice of time and place of proving will was not affected by this section. Johnson v. Richards, 155 Neb. 552, 52 N.W.2d 737 (1952).

Section is constitutional. Did not change construction of statutes providing for publication in weekly newspapers. In re Estate of Johnson, 99 Neb. 275, 155 N.W. 1100 (1916).